Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.17
Title IV-D
child support order; financial information; disclosure; contents.

Any financial information provided to the Department of Health
and Human Services, the county attorney, or the authorized attorney by either
parent for the purpose of facilitating a modification proceeding under sections
43-512.12 to 43-512.18 may be disclosed to the other parties to the case or
to the court. Financial information shall include the following:

(1) An affidavit of financial status provided by the party
requesting review;

(2) An affidavit of financial status of the nonrequesting
party provided by the nonrequesting party or by the requesting party at the
request of the county attorney or authorized attorney;

(3) Supporting documentation such as state and federal income
tax returns, paycheck stubs, W-2 forms, 1099 forms, bank statements, and other
written evidence of financial status; and

(4) Information relating to health care
coverage as provided in subsection (2) of section 42-369.

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 167;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 23;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 68;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 13.